src/adjectives/adjectives.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Adj +Adv +Mas +Fem +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
Ajectives;

LEXICON AjectivesInf
+Adj+Mas+Sg:0	#;
+Adj+Fem+Sg:^e	#;
+Adj+Mas+Pl:^s	#;
+Adj+Mas+Pl:^es	#;

+Adv:0	AdverbInf;

LEXICON AdverbInf
+Mas+Sg:^ment	#;
+Fem+Sg:^ement	#;
+Mas+Pl:^sment	#;
+Mas+Pl:^esment #;

LEXICON Ajectives
abâtardi	AjectivesInf;
aberrant	AjectivesInf;
abolitionniste	AjectivesInf;
abréactif	AjectivesInf;
absinthique	AjectivesInf;
abyssinien	AjectivesInf;
accidenté	AjectivesInf;
acerbe	AjectivesInf;
acido-basique	AjectivesInf;
actif	AjectivesInf;
additionnel	AjectivesInf;
admissible	AjectivesInf;
ænigmatique	AjectivesInf;
ætiologique	AjectivesInf;
affreux	AjectivesInf;
agnathe	AjectivesInf;
ahuri	AjectivesInf;
aisné	AjectivesInf;
alcalin	AjectivesInf;
alexique	AjectivesInf;
alkylé	AjectivesInf;
allotrope	AjectivesInf;
altermondialiste	AjectivesInf;
ambidextre	AjectivesInf;
amiénois	AjectivesInf;
amphibie	AjectivesInf;
anabaptiste	AjectivesInf;
anarchique	AjectivesInf;
anecdotique	AjectivesInf;
angoissé	AjectivesInf;
annelé	AjectivesInf;
antarctique	AjectivesInf;
anti-âge	AjectivesInf;
anticasseur	AjectivesInf;
antidérapant	AjectivesInf;
antimilitariste	AjectivesInf;
antiraciste	AjectivesInf;
antisudorifique	AjectivesInf;
anversois	AjectivesInf;
apicole	AjectivesInf;
applicable	AjectivesInf;
apyrène	AjectivesInf;
aratoire	AjectivesInf;
archiépiscopal	AjectivesInf;
argotique	AjectivesInf;
arrogant	AjectivesInf;
aryen	AjectivesInf;
aspiré	AjectivesInf;
assyrien	AjectivesInf;
asymptotique	AjectivesInf;
atonique	AjectivesInf;
attique	AjectivesInf;
augmentatif	AjectivesInf;
austro-hongrois	AjectivesInf;
autodestructeur	AjectivesInf;
autonettoyante	AjectivesInf;
avancé	AjectivesInf;
avide	AjectivesInf;
azyme	AjectivesInf;
badois	AjectivesInf;
balourd	AjectivesInf;
baraqué	AjectivesInf;
battable	AjectivesInf;
béninois	AjectivesInf;
bidenté	AjectivesInf;
bioaccumulable	AjectivesInf;
biostatique	AjectivesInf;
blafard	AjectivesInf;
bombé	AjectivesInf;
bouffable	AjectivesInf;
bravache	AjectivesInf;
bruni	AjectivesInf;
béotien	AjectivesInf;
cagot	AjectivesInf;
camerounais	AjectivesInf;
capacitif	AjectivesInf;
carbonné	AjectivesInf;
carthaginois	AjectivesInf;
cathare	AjectivesInf;
cendreux	AjectivesInf;
cétoglutarique	AjectivesInf;
charmeur	AjectivesInf;
chevelu	AjectivesInf;
chlorotique	AjectivesInf;
chtimi	AjectivesInf;
circumterrestre	AjectivesInf;
climatisé	AjectivesInf;
collatif	AjectivesInf;
communal	AjectivesInf;
compressible	AjectivesInf;
confiant	AjectivesInf;
conséquent	AjectivesInf;
continu	AjectivesInf;
convoité	AjectivesInf;
corporatiste	AjectivesInf;
cotonnier	AjectivesInf;
craintif	AjectivesInf;
croate	AjectivesInf;
cueilleur	AjectivesInf;
cyclopentanophénanthrénique	AjectivesInf;
débonnaire	AjectivesInf;
déclassifié	AjectivesInf;
déduit	AjectivesInf;
dégoutant	AjectivesInf;
dément	AjectivesInf;
dental	AjectivesInf;
dérobé	AjectivesInf;
désintéressé	AjectivesInf;
déterminant	AjectivesInf;
diacritique	AjectivesInf;
difforme	AjectivesInf;
directionnel	AjectivesInf;
disséminé	AjectivesInf;
divisionnaire	AjectivesInf;
donné	AjectivesInf;
drapier	AjectivesInf;
dynastique	AjectivesInf;
écarlate	AjectivesInf;
édenté	AjectivesInf;
égyptien	AjectivesInf;
éléphantesque	AjectivesInf;
émérite	AjectivesInf;
énantiomérie	AjectivesInf;
endoscopique	AjectivesInf;
énolique	AjectivesInf;
entrepreneurial	AjectivesInf;
éphémère	AjectivesInf;
équatorial	AjectivesInf;
esculapien	AjectivesInf;
éteint	AjectivesInf;
étymologique	AjectivesInf;
excédentaire	AjectivesInf;
exocrine	AjectivesInf;
exquis	AjectivesInf;
fabuliste	AjectivesInf;
familier	AjectivesInf;
faubourien	AjectivesInf;
férié	AjectivesInf;
fétiche	AjectivesInf;
filiforme	AjectivesInf;
flapi	AjectivesInf;
focal	AjectivesInf;
fort	AjectivesInf;
franc	AjectivesInf;
fricoteur	AjectivesInf;
fugace	AjectivesInf;
gagnant	AjectivesInf;
gastro-œsophagien	AjectivesInf;
généralissime	AjectivesInf;
géopolitique	AjectivesInf;
giratoire	AjectivesInf;
glycosidique	AjectivesInf;
graduel	AjectivesInf;
greffé	AjectivesInf;
guarani	AjectivesInf;
Hadopi	AjectivesInf;
hassidique	AjectivesInf;
hémimétabole	AjectivesInf;
herniaire	AjectivesInf;
hexamètre	AjectivesInf;
holométabole	AjectivesInf;
horaire	AjectivesInf;
humoristique	AjectivesInf;
hydrophile	AjectivesInf;
hypersexuel	AjectivesInf;
hémorragique	AjectivesInf;
igné	AjectivesInf;
imbuvable	AjectivesInf;
immunologique	AjectivesInf;
impertinent	AjectivesInf;
imprévoyant	AjectivesInf;
inadapté	AjectivesInf;
incendiaire	AjectivesInf;
inconnu	AjectivesInf;
indéchiffrable	AjectivesInf;
indexé	AjectivesInf;
indomptable	AjectivesInf;
inérotique	AjectivesInf;
inférieur	AjectivesInf;
infrasonore	AjectivesInf;
ininterrompu	AjectivesInf;
inopportun	AjectivesInf;
insolubilisé	AjectivesInf;
insurrectionnel	AjectivesInf;
intercommunal	AjectivesInf;
international	AjectivesInf;
intracaténaire	AjectivesInf;
invalidé	AjectivesInf;
irakien	AjectivesInf;
irremplaçable	AjectivesInf;
isogame	AjectivesInf;
jamaïcain	AjectivesInf;
journalier	AjectivesInf;
kaléidoscopique	AjectivesInf;
lacté	AjectivesInf;
largué	AjectivesInf;
lentissime	AjectivesInf;
libidineux	AjectivesInf;
linoléique	AjectivesInf;
localisé	AjectivesInf;
lucide	AjectivesInf;
macédonien	AjectivesInf;
magnétohydrodynamique	AjectivesInf;
malentendant	AjectivesInf;
mamelouk	AjectivesInf;
manxois	AjectivesInf;
marxien	AjectivesInf;
maussade	AjectivesInf;
médisant	AjectivesInf;
menu	AjectivesInf;
messin	AjectivesInf;
méthodique	AjectivesInf;
miellé	AjectivesInf;
ministériel	AjectivesInf;
mobilier	AjectivesInf;
monarchique	AjectivesInf;
monomoléculaire	AjectivesInf;
morave	AjectivesInf;
moulé	AjectivesInf;
multipolaire	AjectivesInf;
mycorhizal	AjectivesInf;
namurois	AjectivesInf;
nauséabond	AjectivesInf;
néoclassique	AjectivesInf;
neutronique	AjectivesInf;
nobélisable	AjectivesInf;
nordiste	AjectivesInf;
nucléotidique	AjectivesInf;
obsédant	AjectivesInf;
octantième	AjectivesInf;
olographe	AjectivesInf;
opaque	AjectivesInf;
ordinal	AjectivesInf;
orographique	AjectivesInf;
ouralo-altaïque	AjectivesInf;
pædagogique	AjectivesInf;
paludéen	AjectivesInf;
parable	AjectivesInf;
parathyroïdien	AjectivesInf;
particulaire	AjectivesInf;
pâtissière	AjectivesInf;
pédologique	AjectivesInf;
pensif	AjectivesInf;
périgourdin	AjectivesInf;
persistant	AjectivesInf;
phantasmagorique	AjectivesInf;
phoquier	AjectivesInf;
physiopathologique	AjectivesInf;
pince-sans-rire	AjectivesInf;
plasmatique	AjectivesInf;
pluriethnique	AjectivesInf;
pollinique	AjectivesInf;
polyoxygéné	AjectivesInf;
pornographique	AjectivesInf;
postulé	AjectivesInf;
précautionneux	AjectivesInf;
préfrontal	AjectivesInf;
présocratique	AjectivesInf;
privé	AjectivesInf;
progressif	AjectivesInf;
proscrit	AjectivesInf;
provisionnel	AjectivesInf;
psychopathique	AjectivesInf;
purgatif	AjectivesInf;
quadragésimal	AjectivesInf;
quelques	AjectivesInf;
radiatif	AjectivesInf;
ramifié	AjectivesInf;
ravissant	AjectivesInf;
reconcentré	AjectivesInf;
réducteur	AjectivesInf;
relâché	AjectivesInf;
répertorié	AjectivesInf;
résistif	AjectivesInf;
révélateur	AjectivesInf;
riant	AjectivesInf;
rocheux	AjectivesInf;
roubaisien	AjectivesInf;
russe	AjectivesInf;
sacrilège	AjectivesInf;
samaritain	AjectivesInf;
satirique	AjectivesInf;
schématique	AjectivesInf;
séculaire	AjectivesInf;
sénatorial	AjectivesInf;
serein	AjectivesInf;
siccatif	AjectivesInf;
sinistré	AjectivesInf;
sociétal	AjectivesInf;
somnolent	AjectivesInf;
souple	AjectivesInf;
spécifié	AjectivesInf;
stable	AjectivesInf;
stochastique	AjectivesInf;
subalterne	AjectivesInf;
subversif	AjectivesInf;
superfétatoire	AjectivesInf;
surbaissé	AjectivesInf;
surréaliste	AjectivesInf;
sympathisant	AjectivesInf;
séminal	AjectivesInf;
tamoul	AjectivesInf;
taxonomique	AjectivesInf;
temporisateur	AjectivesInf;
testiculaire	AjectivesInf;
thérapeutique	AjectivesInf;
tiédasse	AjectivesInf;
topologique	AjectivesInf;
toxique	AjectivesInf;
transdisciplinaire	AjectivesInf;
transsibérien	AjectivesInf;
trifluoroacétique	AjectivesInf;
troposphérique	AjectivesInf;
typique	AjectivesInf;
unanime	AjectivesInf;
urbanisé	AjectivesInf;
vaccinal	AjectivesInf;
variqueux	AjectivesInf;
venant	AjectivesInf;
vermoulu	AjectivesInf;
vibrationnel	AjectivesInf;
vineux	AjectivesInf;
vitrollais	AjectivesInf;
voyable	AjectivesInf;
xylique	AjectivesInf;
zombique	AjectivesInf;
éligible	AjectivesInf;
